Maine, session 132, LD1421.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §7702-A, sub-§2, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 35, §3, is
amended to read:
C. A person who violates the following sections or rules adopted pursuant to those
sections commits a civil violation for which a fine of not more than $500 per incident
may be adjudged:
(1) Section 7801, subsection 1, paragraph A;
(2) Section 8301‑A; or
(3) Section 8302‑A, subsection 1, paragraphs B to J and subsection 2, paragraphs
A to F and H to K.; or
(4) Section 7708.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §7708 is enacted to read:
§7708. Notification of investigation
A child care facility, as defined in section 8301-A, subsection 1-A, paragraph B, a
family child care provider, as defined in section 8301-A, subsection 1-A, paragraph C, and
a nursery school, as defined in section 8301-A, subsection 1-A, paragraph D, shall notify
the parent or legal guardian of a child enrolled in that facility or nursery school or receiving
services from that provider if the facility, nursery school or provider is under investigation
for violating any provision of chapter 1661, 1663, 1673 or 1675. This section may not be
construed to require the facility, nursery school or provider to notify the parent or legal
guardian of the nature of the investigation or provide any personal information.